Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1319
Interfering with picketing; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of interfering with picketing if, acting separately or with others, he interferes with any picketing not described as mass picketing in section 28-1318, except that this provision shall not apply to duly qualified peace officers or to court action.

(2) Interfering with picketing is a Class III misdemeanor. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 303.